src/scripts/Russian/downcase.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Downcase 
А -> а || _ ,, 
Б -> б || _ ,, 
В -> в || _ ,, 
Г -> г || _ ,, 
Д -> д || _ ,, 
Е -> е || _ ,, 
Ё -> ё || _ ,, 
Ж -> ж || _ ,, 
З -> з || _ ,, 
И -> и || _ ,, 
Й -> й || _ ,, 
К -> к || _ ,, 
Л -> л || _ ,, 
М -> м || _ ,, 
Н -> н || _ ,, 
О -> о || _ ,, 
П -> п || _ ,, 
Р -> р || _ ,, 
С -> с || _ ,, 
Т -> т || _ ,, 
У -> у || _ ,, 
Ф -> ф || _ ,, 
Х -> х || _ ,, 
Ц -> ц || _ ,, 
Ч -> ч || _ ,, 
Ш -> ш || _ ,, 
Щ -> щ || _ ,, 
Ъ -> ъ || _ ,, 
Ы -> ы || _ ,, 
Ь -> ь || _ ,, 
Э -> э || _ ,, 
Ю -> ю || _ ,, 
Я -> я || _ ,, 
A -> a || _ ,, 
B -> b || _ ,, 
C -> c || _ ,, 
D -> d || _ ,, 
E -> e || _ ,, 
F -> f || _ ,, 
G -> g || _ ,, 
H -> h || _ ,, 
I -> i || _ ,, 
J -> j || _ ,, 
K -> k || _ ,, 
L -> l || _ ,, 
M -> m || _ ,, 
N -> n || _ ,, 
O -> o || _ ,, 
P -> p || _ ,, 
Q -> q || _ ,, 
R -> r || _ ,, 
S -> s || _ ,, 
T -> t || _ ,, 
U -> u || _ ,, 
V -> v || _ ,, 
W -> w || _ ,, 
X -> x || _ ,, 
Y -> y || _ ,, 
Z -> z || _ ; 

regex 
Downcase ; 
